Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Economic Development Corporation [Repealed]

4-17-101 — 4-17-112. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 17, §§4-17-101 —4-17-112 (Acts 1986, ch. 867, §§ 2-15; 1987, ch. 144, §§ 1-11), concerning the economic development corporation, was repealed by Acts 1989, ch. 212, § 10, effective April 27, 1989, and has been designated part 1 in view of the addition of part 2 of this chapter in 1989.